Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Small Grain Industry

247.5061.
Promotion for small grain production.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of small grains shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of small grains in promoting and stimulating, by utilization research, market maintenance and expansion, and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of small grains and small grains products; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of small grains and small grains products to market.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5063.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Small grains” means all kinds and varieties of cereal grains.

“Bushel” means the weight for each type of cereal grain defined by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA);

“Producer” means every person who produces and markets small grains;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing small grains at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity;

“Marketing year” means from June 1 to May 31 of the following year;

“Purchaser” means any person, public or private corporation, federal Commodity Credit Corporation, association, or partnership buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring the property in or to small grains from a producer, and shall include a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the producer, when the actual or constructive possession of the small grains is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of a mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim; and

“Marketed” means any quantities that are sold, bartered, or for which other items of value are exchanged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5065.
Association of producers not illegal or in restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of small grains shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5067.
Referendum levying assessment.

It is declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of small grains shall be permitted by referendum to be held among the respective groups and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

to levy upon themselves an assessment on small grains and provide for the collection of the assessment for the purpose of financing or contributing toward the financing of a program of research, market development, and education to increase the domestic and foreign consumption, use, sale, and markets for small grains and small grains products; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of small grains and small grains products to market.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5069.
Application for assessment referendum — Contents of form — Publication.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of the small grains producers of Kentucky, such as the Kentucky Small Grain Growers Association, may at any time after July 13, 1990, make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by the board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of small grains upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

and collecting and utilizing the assessment for the purpose stated in the referendum. The application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide basis;

Proposed effective date of the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

Upon receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5071.
Certified association authorized to hold referendum.

Upon being certified by the Commissioner of Agriculture, the association shall be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of small grains a referendum on the question of whether the producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under, and subject to, and for the purpose stated in KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

. The referendum shall be conducted on a statewide basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5073.
Referendum on statewide basis.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

shall be held on a statewide basis. The referendum may be participated in by all small grains producers, including owners of farms on which small grains are produced, and tenants and sharecroppers sharing in the proceeds of small grains. In the referendum, individuals eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5075.
Supervision of referendum by Commissioner — Expenses.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5077.
Commissioner to determine date and other details of referendum.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine, and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours, and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which the assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which the amount collected shall be applied. No assessment levied under the provisions of any referendum shall exceed one fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the net marketed price per bushel on the small grains marketed in the state during a marketing year by any producer included in the group to which the referendum was submitted or by any person subsequently becoming a new producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5079.
Commissioner to prescribe rules of holding referendum — Notice — Limit of assessment.

The hours, voting places, rules, and regulations for the referendum shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture and shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days before the holding of the referendum, and direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agent in any county covered by the referendum. The notice shall likewise contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, which assessment in any event shall not exceed one fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the net marketed price per bushel, and shall likewise state the method by which the assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds shall be administered and the purposes to which the proceeds shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 47, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5081.
Ballots — Canvass and declaration of result.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum all necessary ballots and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Following the referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter, the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5083.
Effect of affirmative vote.

If, in the referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, a majority of the eligible producers, who vote therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of the levying and collection of the assessment proposed in the referendum, the assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

247.5085.
Notice of deduction required — Disposition of collections — Records.

If a majority of the eligible producers in the referendum who vote therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, all persons engaged in the business of purchasing small grains in this state, that on and after the date specified in the letter, the specified assessment shall be deducted from the producer’s payment by the purchaser, or his agent or representative, from the net marketed price of the small grains. The assessment so deducted shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which the small grains are sold to the purchaser, be remitted by the purchaser to the duly certified association which conducted the referendum. The books and records of all the purchasers of small grains shall at all times be open for inspection by the Commissioner of Agriculture or his duly authorized agents during regular business hours.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 47, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5087.
Kentucky Small Grain Promotion Council.

There is hereby established a Kentucky Small Grain Promotion Council composed of four (4) members appointed by the certified organization; two (2) members appointed by the association representing the largest number of small grains farmers in the state; and one (1) member appointed by the Commissioner. These appointments shall be for terms of two (2) calendar years and each appointing body shall promptly file with the Commissioner the names of its respective appointees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 47, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5089.
Use of assessment funds.

The funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations, and grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, by research, market development and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of small grains and small grains products; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of small grains and small grains products to market. None of these funds shall be used to lobby as defined in KRS

6.611

. The duly certified association receiving the assessment funds shall, upon the advice and consent of the Kentucky Small Grain Promotion Council, use and disburse the same as follows:

The association may first refund to itself therefrom the costs and expenses incurred in the conduct of the referendum;

The association may spend or disburse the necessary funds therefrom for administrative costs and expenses, but no more than fifteen percent (15%) of the funds collected in any marketing year shall be so utilized; and

The balance remaining shall be used for the purposes provided in this section, as determined by the Kentucky Small Grain Promotion Council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 66, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 47, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5091.
Refund of assessment collected from producer.

If the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any producer upon and against whom the assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result thereof, may demand of and receive from the treasurer of the certified association a refund of the assessment collected from the producer; if the demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days after the date on which the assessment is collected from the producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 47, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5093.
Procedures to terminate assessment.

The question of the levy of the assessment on small grains may be referred to a vote of the small grains producers of the state by filing petitions with the certified association containing signatures of Kentucky small grains producers equal in number to ten percent (10%) of all small grains producers in the state as recorded in the latest United States Census of Agriculture. If after the petitions are filed and at the referendum election a majority of Kentucky small grains producers voting on the question vote against the levy on small grains, the assessment shall be terminated at the end of the marketing year in which the referendum was conducted; otherwise, the assessment program shall continue.

If the duly certified association of small grains producers expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the program, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the marketing year in which the board action is taken; and, in this event, the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, the purchasers of small grains affected thereby of the termination of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 47, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

247.5095.
Injunction against violations.

When in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, a purchaser has engaged in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Circuit Court of the county wherein the said acts or practices are alleged to have occurred for an order enjoining the act or acts or practices, and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 397, § 18, effective July 13, 1990.